Washington statutes.
RCW 13.06.020

State to share in cost.

From any state moneys made available for such purpose, the state of Washington, through the department of children, youth, and families, shall, in accordance with this chapter and applicable departmental rules, share in the cost of providing services to juveniles.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 716; 1983 c 191 s 2; 1979 c 141 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 165 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.